extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX k Y 94
SFX k idis    idis            idis      
SFK k idis    idos            idis      
SFX k idis    idem            idis      
SFX k idis    iden            idis      
SFX k idis    idi             idis      
SFX k idis    ide             idis      
SFX k idis    ida             idis      
SFX k idis    im              idis      
SFX k idis    in              idis      
SFX k idis    i               idis      
SFX k idis    idum            idis      
SFX k idis    ides            idis      
SFX k idis    idibus          idis      
SFX k idis    idas            idis      
SFX k 0       que             idis      
SFX k 0       ne              idis      
SFX k 0       ve              idis      
SFX k idis    idemque         idis      
SFX k idis    idemne          idis      
SFX k idis    idemve          idis      
SFX k idis    idenque         idis      
SFX k idis    idenne          idis      
SFX k idis    idenve          idis      
SFX k idis    idaque          idis      
SFX k idis    idane           idis      
SFX k idis    idave           idis      
SFX k idis    imque           idis      
SFX k idis    imne            idis      
SFX k idis    imve            idis      
SFX k idis    inque           idis      
SFX k idis    inne            idis      
SFX k idis    inve            idis      
SFX k idis    ique            idis      
SFX k idis    ine             idis      
SFX k idis    ive             idis      
SFX k idis    idique          idis      
SFX k idis    idine           idis      
SFX k idis    idive           idis      
SFX k idis    ideque          idis      
SFX k idis    idene           idis      
SFX k idis    ideve           idis      
SFX k idis    idesque         idis      
SFX k idis    idesne          idis      
SFX k idis    idesve          idis      
SFX k idis    idasque         idis      
SFX k idis    idasne          idis      
SFX k idis    idasve          idis      
SFX k idis    idibusque       idis      
SFX k idis    idibusne        idis      
SFX k idis    idibusve        idis      
SFX k idis    idumque         idis      
SFX k idis    idumne          idis      
SFX k idis    idumve          idis      
SFX k adis   adis           adis     
SFK k adis   ados           adis     
SFX k adis   adem           adis     
SFX k adis   aden           adis     
SFX k adis   adi            adis     
SFX k adis   ade            adis     
SFX k adis   ada            adis     
SFX k adis   adum           adis     
SFX k adis   ades           adis     
SFX k adis   adibus         adis     
SFX k adis   adas           adis     
SFX k 0       que             adis     
SFX k 0       ne              adis     
SFX k 0       ve              adis     
SFX k adis   ademque        adis     
SFX k adis   ademne         adis     
SFX k adis   ademve         adis     
SFX k adis   adenque        adis     
SFX k adis   adenne         adis     
SFX k adis   adenve         adis     
SFX k adis   adaque         adis     
SFX k adis   adane          adis     
SFX k adis   adave          adis     
SFX k adis   adique         adis     
SFX k adis   adine          adis     
SFX k adis   adive          adis     
SFX k adis   adeque         adis     
SFX k adis   adene          adis     
SFX k adis   adeve          adis     
SFX k adis   adesque        adis     
SFX k adis   adesne         adis     
SFX k adis   adesve         adis     
SFX k adis   adasque        adis     
SFX k adis   adasne         adis     
SFX k adis   adasve         adis     
SFX k adis   adibusque      adis     
SFX k adis   adibusne       adis     
SFX k adis   adibusve       adis     
SFX k adis   adumque        adis     
SFX k adis   adumne         adis     
SFX k adis   adumve         adis     

SFX m Y 46
SFX m ys      ys              ys        
SFX m ys      yos             ys        
SFX m ys      yis             ys        
SFX m ys      ym              ys        
SFX m ys      yn              ys        
SFX m ys      ye              ys        
SFX m ys      y               ys        
SFX m 0       que             ys        
SFX m 0       ne              ys        
SFX m 0       ve              ys        
SFX m ys      ysque           ys        
SFX m ys      ysne            ys        
SFX m ys      ysve            ys        
SFX m ys      yosque          ys        
SFX m ys      yosne           ys        
SFX m ys      yosve           ys        
SFX m ys      yisque          ys        
SFX m ys      yisne           ys        
SFX m ys      yisve           ys        
SFX m ys      ymque           ys        
SFX m ys      ymne            ys        
SFX m ys      ymve            ys        
SFX m ys      ynque           ys        
SFX m ys      ynne            ys        
SFX m ys      ynve            ys        
SFX m ys      yeque           ys        
SFX m ys      yene            ys        
SFX m ys      yeve            ys        
SFX m ys      yque            ys        
SFX m ys      yne             ys        
SFX m ys      yve             ys        
SFX m y       y               y         
SFX m y       yos             y         
SFX m y       ye              y         
SFX m 0       que             y         
SFX m 0       ne              y         
SFX m 0       ve              y         
SFX m y       yque            y         
SFX m y       yne             y         
SFX m y       yve             y         
SFX m y       yosque          y         
SFX m y       yosne           y         
SFX m y       yosve           y         
SFX m y       yeque           y         
SFX m y       yene            y         
SFX m y       yeve            y         
