extras/dictionaries/la.dic
acalanthidis/k
acanthidis/k
Achaiadis/k
Achaemenidis/k
Acheloidis/k
Achilleidis/k
Acidis/k
Actiadis/k
Adargatidis/k
Adrastidis/k
Aeetidadis/k
aegidis/k
Aeneidis/k
Aepy/m
Aethiopidis/k
Aetolidis/k
Agesipolidis/k
aglaophotidis/k
Alcidis/k
Alidis/k
Alpheiadis/k
Amaryllidis/k
Amasidis/k
Amazonidis/k
amfibrachys/m
amomidis/k
amphibrachys/m
amystidis/k
Anaitidis/k
analeptridis/k
andronitidis/k
anteridis/k
Anthemusiadis/k
anthyllidis/k
Antoniniadis/k
Aornidis/k
aphrodisiadis/k
Appiadis/k
Arcadis/k
Arethusidis/k
Argolidis/k
argyritidis/k
aridis/k
Artemidis/k
arthritidis/k
Ascuridis/k
Asopidis/k
Aspidis/k
asty/m
Athamantidis/k
Athracidis/k
Atlantidis/k
atractylidis/k
Atthidis/k
Attys/m
Atys/m
Aulidis/k
Azotidis/k
Bacchidis/k
balanitidis/k
Bassaridis/k
battidis/k
Beliadis/k
bellidis/k
Berenicidis/k
Bistonidis/k
Bittidis/k
Boeotidis/k
boreotidis/k
boscidis/k
botrys/m
Botrys/m
braty/m
Briseidis/k
Brittannidis/k
Bubasidis/k
buniadis/k
Byblidis/k
cachrys/m
Cadmeidis/k
callistruthidis/k
cantharidis/k
Capheridis/k
capnitidis/k
Capys/m
Carambidis/k
caryotidis/k
Castalidis/k
catochitidis/k
Gebrenidis/k
cedridis/k
cenchridis/k
Cephaloedidis/k
Cepheidis/k
Cephisidis/k
cepitidis/k
ceramitidis/k
Cercinitidis/k
ceritidis/k
chalcidis/k
chalcitidis/k
chamaedrys/m
chamaepitys/m
Chaonidis/k
chelys/m
chernitidis/k
chloritidis/k
choeradis/k
Chryseidis/k
chrysitidis/k
chrysolampidis/k
chrysophrys/m
cicidis/k
Cisseidis/k
clamidis/k
clematitidis/k
Clymeneidis/k
cochlidis/k
collyridis/k
coloquintidis/k
colymbadis/k
Copaidis/k
Coptidis/k
Coronidis/k
Corsidis/k
Cotys/m
crataegidis/k
crateritidis/k
crepidis/k
Creusidis/k
crocidis/k
Crommyuacridis/k
cuspidis/k
cycladis/k
cymbalitidis/k
Cynosuridis/k
cyperidis/k
Cytaeidis/k
Cythereidis/k
dactylidis/k
dafnoidis/k
Daphnidis/k
Dardanidis/k
dasys/m
Daulidis/k
Dauniadis/k
decadis/k
Delphidis/k
dendritidis/k
dibrachys/m
dieteridis/k
diploidis/k
docidis/k
Dodonidis/k
doreadis/k
draconitidis/k
Dromadis/k
Druiadis/k
Dryadis/k
dryopteridis/k
Dymantidis/k
ecboladis/k
echitidis/k
Eleidis/k
Eliadis/k
Emathidis/k
encanthidis/k
enhydridis/k
enneadecaeteridis/k
enneadis/k
ephemeridis/k
epidermidis/k
Epimethidis/k
epitoxidis/k
Erechthidis/k
Erinys/m
Eridis/k
Erymanthidis/k
Euboidis/k
Euiadis/k
Euphratidis/k
Eurytidis/k
exomidis/k
galactitidis/k
Gangetidis/k
gelotophyllidis/k
glanidis/k
glicy/m
glycy/m
glycymaridis/k
Gnosidis/k
Gracchuridis/k
graphidis/k
gymnadis/k
Haemonidis/k
haemorrhoidis/k
Halys/m
hammitidis/k
hapsidis/k
Hecateidis/k
hedypnoidis/k
Heliconidis/k
Helladis/k
hemitritidis/k
Hephaestiadis/k
heptadis/k
heroidis/k
Hestiaeotidis/k
hexadis/k
hiberidis/k
Hilluridis/k
hippophobadis/k
Homoloidis/k
Hyarotidis/k
hydatidis/k
Hyperionidis/k
hypobraxhys/m
hypomelidis/k
Iardanidis/k
Iasidis/k
ibidis/k
Icaridis/k
ictidis/k
Iliadis/k
Inachidis/k
Iridis/k
isatidis/k
Isidis/k
Israelitidis/k
Itys/m
Iulidis/k
Labeatidis/k
lagoidis/k
lampadis/k
lathyridis/k
Letoidis/k
Lauriotidis/k
Lemniadis/k
lepidotidis/k
Lesbiadis/k
Letoidis/k
leucanthemidis/k
leucaspidis/k
leucographidis/k
Leucophrys/m
Libanitidis/k
Libys/m
Libystidis/k
lignys/m
Limnatidis/k
Limoniadis/k
Liparidis/k
lonchitidis/k
Lycaonidis/k
lychnitidis/k
Lycoridis/k
Lyrnesiadis/k
maccidis/k
maenadis/k
Maeotidis/k
Magnetidis/k
Mareotidis/k
meconitidis/k
Megaridis/k
meliceridis/k
melotridis/k
Memphidis/k
Menelaidis/k
Meroidis/k
mesobrachys/m
Methymniadis/k
Milyadis/k
Minyadis/k
Minyeidis/k
misy/m
Moabitidis/k
Moeridis/k
Molossidis/k
moly/m
molybditidis/k
monocrepidis/k
my/m
Mygdonidis/k
myriadis/k
myrridis/k
myrsinitidis/k
mys/m
Mys/m
Nabidis/k
Naidis/k
napy/m
Nasamoniadis/k
Neapolitidis/k
Nectanabidis/k
Nepheleiadis/k
nephritidis/k
Nesidis/k
neuradis/k
Niseidis/k
Nomadis/k
nycteridis/k
Nysiadis/k
Oceanidis/k
octaeteridis/k
odontitidis/k
Oechalidis/k
oeniteridis/k
Olympiadis/k
onobrychidis/k
ononidis/k
onychitidis/k
ophrys/m
oreadis/k
oritidis/k
orobitidis/k
ostracitidis/k
ostrys/m
Othrys/m
otidis/k
ozaenitidis/k
paeanitidis/k
Palladis/k
Pallantidis/k
parapsidis/k
parastichidis/k
Parnasidis/k
parotidis/k
Patareidis/k
Pelasgiadis/k
Peliadis/k
Pelioriadis/k
Peloridis/k
pentaeteridis/k
peplidis/k
Permessidis/k
Persidis/k
Phaeacidis/k
Phaethontiadis/k
phalangitidis/k
Phalaridis/k
Phaselidis/k
Phasidis/k
Phlegethontidis/k
phlomidis/k
phocidis/k
phoenicitidis/k
Phorcys/m
Phoronidis/k
Phthiadis/k
phy/m
phycidis/k
Phylaceidis/k
physice/k
Pieridis/k
Pimpliadis/k
piramidis/k
Pittheidis/k
Pleiadis/k
pleuritidis/k
plinthidis/k
poetridis/k
potamaugidis/k
Potamidis/k
Priameidis/k
probrachys/m
Procridis/k
Prognidis/k
promulsidis/k
prophetidis/k
prosopidis/k
prostomidis/k
psacadis/k
psecadis/k
pseudoprophetidis/k
psoranthemidis/k
Ptolemaidis/k
puxidis/k
pyrallidis/k
pyritidis/k
Pythiadis/k
raphanitidis/k
Rhescuporidis/k
rhoditidis/k
rhoeadis/k
Salmacidis/k
Samaritidis/k
sancaptidis/k
sandalidis/k
sarcitidis/k
saucaptidis/k
Sauromatidis/k
scelererytidis/k
Schoenidis/k
Scironidis/k
scordotidis/k
Scyreidis/k
Scythidis/k
seleucidis/k
Semiramidis/k
Serapidis/k
Sesosidis/k
Sestiadis/k
Sicelidis/k
Sidonidis/k
Sirenidis/k
Sithonidis/k
smyridis/k
sory/m
sphragidis/k
spongitidis/k
stachys/m
staphidis/k
stelidis/k
sterelytidis/k
stoechadis/k
Stratonicidis/k
Stymphalidis/k
Sunamitidis/k
sycitidis/k
symplegadis/k
Synnadis/k
synodontitidis/k
syringitidis/k
Tanaidis/k
Tantalidis/k
Tauridis/k
Telmessidis/k
tephritidis/k
Tethys/m
tetradis/k
teuchitidis/k
Thaidis/k
Thaumantiadis/k
Thebaidis/k
Themidis/k
Theseidis/k
Thespidis/k
Thessalidis/k
Thetidis/k
Thoantidis/k
Thyamidis/k
Thybridis/k
Thyniadis/k
Thyrsidis/k
tigridis/k
Tiphys/m
Titanidis/k
Tolomaidis/k
Trachonitidis/k
trachy/m
triadis/k
tribrachys/m
trichitidis/k
trieteridis/k
Triopeidis/k
Tritonidis/k
Troglodytidis/k
troxallidis/k
Typhoidis/k
xyridis/k
Zeuxidis/k
zygidis/k
